Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 2. General Provisions

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 20-5-201.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.”

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

Cited in

NC v. State, 2013 WY 2,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Jan 9, 2013).

§ 20-5-202.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Abandoned” means left without provision for reasonable and necessary care or supervision;

“Child” means an individual who has not attained eighteen (18) years of age;

“Child custody determination” means a judgment, decree or other order of a court providing for the legal custody, physical custody or visitation with respect to a child, including a permanent, temporary, initial or modification order. “Child custody determination” shall not include an order relating to child support or other monetary obligation of an individual;

“Child custody proceeding” means a proceeding in which legal custody, physical custody or visitation with respect to a child is an issue, including a proceeding for divorce, separation, neglect, abuse, dependency, guardianship, paternity, termination of parental rights or protection from domestic violence in which the issue may appear. “Child custody proceeding” shall not include a proceeding involving juvenile delinquency, contractual emancipation or enforcement under article 4 of this act;

“Commencement” means the filing of the first pleading in a proceeding;

“Court” means an entity authorized under the law of a state to establish, enforce or modify a child custody determination;

“Home state” means the state in which a child lived with a parent or a person acting as a parent for at least six (6) consecutive months immediately before the commencement of a child custody proceeding or, in the case of a child less than six (6) months of age, the state in which the child lived from birth with a parent or a person acting as a parent. A period of temporary absence of any of the persons mentioned is part of the period;

“Initial determination” means the first child custody determination concerning a particular child;

“Issuing court” means the court that makes a child custody determination for which enforcement is sought under this act;

“Issuing state” means the state in which a child custody determination is made;

“Modification” means a child custody determination that changes, replaces, supersedes or is otherwise made after a previous determination concerning the same child, whether or not it is made by the court that made the previous determination;

“Person” means as defined by W.S. 8-1-102(a)(vi);

“Person acting as a parent” means a person, other than a parent, who:

Has physical custody of the child or has had physical custody for a period of six (6) consecutive months, including any temporary absence, within one (1) year immediately before the commencement of a child custody proceeding; and

Has been awarded legal custody by a court or claims a right to legal custody under the law of this state.

“Physical custody” means the physical care and supervision of a child;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“Tribe” means an Indian tribe or band, or Alaskan native village, which is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state;

“Warrant” means an order issued by a court authorizing law enforcement officers to take physical custody of a child;

“This act” means W.S.

20-5-201

through

20-5-502

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

"Home state."

Wyoming courts properly exercised jurisdiction in a child custody matter because Wyoming was the subject children's “home state,” as (1) there were no proceedings in another jurisdiction requiring a determination between competing alternatives, and (2) the parties returned to Wyoming slightly more than six months before the children's mother filed for divorce. Harignordoquy v. Barlow, 2013 WY 149, 313 P.3d 1265,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2013), cert. denied, 574 U.S. 817, 135 S. Ct. 66, 190 L. Ed. 2d 33, 2014 U.S. LEXIS 5136 (U.S. 2014).

Wyoming court improperly assumed jurisdiction under the significant connection provisions in former
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-5-104(a)(ii) where Texas was the minor child's “home state” under former
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 20-5-103(a)(v) and
20-5-104(a)(i) (repealed; now see §
20-5-301(a)(i)). and
Tex. Fam. Code Ann. § 152.201(a)(1). A foreign state which is neither a decree state nor a home state may not assume jurisdiction in contravention to the preference in the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act and the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act,
28 U.S.C.S. § 1738A(c)(2)(A)(ii), for home state jurisdiction.
NMC v. JLW ex rel. NAW, 2004 WY 56, 90 P.3d 93,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2004).

Child custody proceeding. —

Proceeding in Wyoming brought by children's maternal grandmother
after the children had been abused in Texas by their mother's boyfriend
was an interstate child custody proceeding under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-5-202(a)(iv) and the Wyoming trial court's jurisdiction was governed
by the UCCJEA.
SC v. State (In re NC), 2013 WY 2, 294 P.3d 866,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2013).

§ 20-5-203.
Proceedings governed by other law.

This act shall not govern an adoption proceeding or a proceeding pertaining to the authorization of emergency medical care for a child.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-204.
Application to tribes.

A child custody proceeding that pertains to an Indian child as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. 1901 et seq., shall not be subject to this act to the extent that it is governed by the Indian Child Welfare Act.

A court of this state shall treat a tribe as if the tribe were a state of the United States for the purpose of applying articles 2 and 3 of this act.

A child custody determination made by a tribe under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this act shall be recognized and enforced under article 4 of this act.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-205.
International application.

A court of this state shall treat a foreign country as if it were a state of the United States for the purpose of applying articles 2 and 3 of this act.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a child custody determination made in a foreign country under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this act shall be recognized and enforced under article 4 of this act.

A court of this state may not apply this act if the child custody law of a foreign country violates fundamental principles of human rights.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-206.
Effect of child custody determination.

A child custody determination made by a court of this state that had jurisdiction under this act shall bind all persons who have been served in accordance with the laws of this state or notified in accordance with W.S.

20-5-208

or who have submitted to the jurisdiction of the court and who have been given an opportunity to be heard. As to those persons, the determination shall be conclusive as to all decided issues of law and fact except to the extent the determination is modified.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Custody determination to be made in forum with best access to relevant evidence. —

The provisions of former § 20-5-102(a)(iii) were an explicit recognition that the paramount consideration of the best interest of the child mandates that custody determinations be made in the forum having the best access to the relevant evidence. Quenzer v. Quenzer, 653 P.2d 295,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 460 U.S. 1041, 103 S. Ct. 1436, 75 L. Ed. 2d 794, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 4204 (U.S. 1983).

Factors considered in determining jurisdiction of second state in custody question. —

When child custody is awarded in a divorce decree in one state and the child-custody question is later presented to a court of another state, a number of considerations affect the determination as to whether the second state may exercise jurisdiction, including: domicile, presence in the state, lack of jurisdiction in the first state to render the original decree, forum shopping, child stealing, best interests of the child, full faith and credit, comity, child abuse, abandonment, etc. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Purpose would be thwarted. —

Although it would be judicially efficient to approve the district court's actions in assuming jurisdiction over the father's motion to set aside and vacate portions of a divorce decree relating to child custody and support since the children had been in Wyoming longer than six months, such an action by the supreme court would undermine the legislative function, the purposes behind the former Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act jurisdictional requirements, and the basic doctrine of subject matter jurisdiction. Weller v. Weller, 960 P.2d 493,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 20-5-207.
Priority.

If a question of existence or exercise of jurisdiction under this act is raised in a child custody proceeding, the question, upon request of a party, shall be given priority on the calendar and handled expeditiously.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-208.
Notice to persons outside of state.

Notice required for the exercise of jurisdiction when a person is outside this state may be given in a manner prescribed by the law of this state for service of process or by the law of the state in which the service is made. Notice shall be given in a manner reasonably calculated to give actual notice but may be by publication if other means are not effective.

Proof of service may be made in the manner prescribed by the law of this state or by the law of the state in which the service is made.

Notice shall not be required for the exercise of jurisdiction with respect to a person who submits to the jurisdiction of the court.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 20-5-209.
Appearance and limited immunity.

A party to a child custody proceeding, including a modification proceeding, or a petitioner or respondent in a proceeding to enforce or register a child custody determination, shall not be subject to personal jurisdiction in this state for another proceeding or purpose solely by reason of having participated, or of having been physically present for the purpose of participating, in the proceeding.

A person who is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state on a basis other than physical presence shall not be immune from service of process in this state. A party present in this state who is subject to the jurisdiction of another state shall not be immune from service of process allowable under the laws of that state.

The immunity granted by subsection (a) of this section shall not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to the participation in a proceeding under this act committed by an individual while present in this state.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-210.
Communication between courts.

A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this act.

The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. If the parties are not able to participate in the communication, the parties shall be given the opportunity to present facts and legal arguments before a decision on jurisdiction may be made.

Communication between courts on schedules, calendars, court records and similar matters may occur without informing the parties. A record need not be made of the communication made pursuant to this subsection.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a record shall be made of a communication under this section. The parties shall be informed promptly of the communication and granted access to the record.

For the purposes of this section, “record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-211.
Taking testimony in another state.

In addition to other procedures available to a party, a party to a child custody proceeding may offer testimony of witnesses who are located in another state, including testimony of the parties and the child, by deposition or other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in the other state. The court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a person be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony shall be taken.

A court of this state may permit an individual residing in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone, audiovisual means or other electronic means before a designated court or at another location in that state. A court of this state shall cooperate with courts of other states in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a court of this state by technological means that do not produce an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 20-5-212.
Cooperation between courts; preservation of record.

A court of this state may request the appropriate court of another state to:

Hold an evidentiary hearing;

Order a person to produce or give evidence pursuant to procedures of that state;

Order that an evaluation be made with respect to the custody of a child involved in a pending proceeding;

Forward to the court of this state a certified copy of the transcript of the record of the hearing, the evidence otherwise presented and any evaluation prepared in compliance with the request; and

Order a party to a child custody proceeding or any person having physical custody of the child to appear in the proceeding with or without the child.

Upon request of a court of another state, a court of this state may hold a hearing or enter an order described in subsection (a) of this section.

Travel and other necessary and reasonable expenses incurred under subsections (a) and (b) of this section may be assessed against the parties according to the law of this state.

A court of this state shall preserve the pleadings, orders, decrees, records of hearings, evaluations and other pertinent records with respect to a child custody proceeding until the child attains eighteen (18) years of age. Upon appropriate request by a court or law enforcement official of another state, the court shall forward a certified copy of those records.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).